Utah statutes.
7-2-4.   Consent required for institution to resume business.
The institution or other person may resume business only with the consent of
and upon conditions approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may give
his consent to resumption of business if arrangements have been made by the
institution or its stockholders, by reorganization or otherwise, to the
satisfaction of the commissioner, to pay all creditors of the institution,
aside from the stockholders, and to remedy the default or condition for which
possession was taken and to pay the expenses of the proceeding.
